Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-210
Expiration of license; conditions.

An advanced practice registered nurse's license expires if he or she does not renew his or her license to practice as a registered nurse or is not authorized to practice as a registered nurse in this state under the Nurse Licensure Compact.

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 45;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-17,140;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 41;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 149.

Nurse Licensure Compact, see section 71-1795.01.